Nevada, session 83, AB185.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 116 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the executive
board shall not and the governing documents must not prohibit a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
unit’s owner or tenant from operating a licensed child care facility
within such physical portion of the common-interest community as
that owner or tenant has a right to occupy and use exclusively.
2. The executive board and the governing documents may:
(a) Impose conditions or restrictions on a licensed child care
facility that are consistent with the requirements to obtain a
license for a child care facility pursuant to chapter 432A of NRS;
(b) Limit the number of licensed child care facilities in the
common-interest community to one licensed child care facility or
one licensed child care facility per 200 units, whichever is greater;
(c) Require a unit’s owner or tenant to file a notice with the
executive board or a designee of the executive board of an
application for licensure of a child care facility; or
(d) Require the licensed child care facility to add the unit-
owners’ association as an additional insured in an insurance
policy held by the licensed child care facility in an amount not to
exceed the amount required by the licensing agency for the
childcare facility.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
provisions of this section apply to a common-interest community,
including, without limitation, a master association and any
common-interest community that is subject to a master
association.
4. The provisions of this section do not apply to a common-
interest community that:
(a) Is housing for older persons; or
(b) Contains units that share an interior wall with another
unit, including, without limitation, a condominium or townhouse.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt a
unit’s owner or tenant from compliance with any provision in the
governing documents that apply to each unit’s owner or tenant,
including, without limitation, any provisions governing nuisances,
use of common-areas, parking, signage and traffic.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Housing for older persons” has the meaning ascribed to it
in 42 U.S.C. § 3607.
(b) “Licensed child care facility” means a child care facility
licensed pursuant to chapter 432A of NRS that provides care for at
least 5 but not more than 12 children.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2. Chapter 118A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Unless otherwise prohibited by the terms of the rental
agreement, a tenant may operate a licensed child care facility in
the dwelling unit of the tenant.
2. As used in this section, “licensed child care facility” means
a child care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 432A of NRS that
provides care for at least 5 but not more than 12 children.
Secs. 3-8. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)